src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! # Meänkieli conjunctions

!! This file documents [the file for Meänkieli conjunctions](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc).

!! It contains two parts, one for adding tags, and one for listing conjunctions.

!! ## Adding tags

LEXICON conjx !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+CC: # ;      !!≈ * @CODE@ 

LEXICON cc !!≈ * @CODE@ why two... 
+CC: # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 

LEXICON cc_agr !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+CC: # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:n # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:t # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Sg3:i # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Pl1:mä # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Pl2:tä # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
+Pl3:ivä # ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 


!! ## The conjunctions themselves

LEXICON Conjunction !!≈ * @CODE@ 
ja cc ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
ynnä cc ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
sekä cc ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
ette cc_agr ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
eli cc ; !! ... and some 20 more
taikka cc ;
vaikka conjx ;
koska conjx ;
jopa conjx ;
nopa conjx ;
mutta conjx ;
sese conjx ;
vai conjx ;
eli conjx ;
sati conjx ;
silti conjx ;
paitti conjx ;
niin conjx ;
siis conjx ;
jos conjx ;
niinku conjx ;
niinku+Err/Orth:niinko conjx ;
ja+Err/Lex:och conjx ; !CHECK TT
kuten conjx ;
elikkä conjx ;
että conjx ;
ko conjx ; !CHECK EK
ku conjx ; !CHECK EK
